Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.780

Other laws not repealed or limited.

RCW 28B.30.700 through 28B.30.780 is concurrent with other legislation with reference to providing funds for the construction of buildings at Washington State University, and is not to be construed as repealing or limiting any existing provision of law with reference thereto.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.30.780. Prior: 1961 ex.s. c 12 s 9. Formerly RCW 28.80.580.]